lt_LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 7376 Y 2
SFX 7376 urti urti/546 . 349
SFX 7376 urtis urtis/546 . 349

SFX 7377 Y 2
SFX 7377 urti urti/547 . 349
SFX 7377 urtis urtis/547 . 349

SFX 7378 Y 2
SFX 7378 urti urti/548 . 349
SFX 7378 urtis urtis/548 . 349

SFX 7379 Y 2
SFX 7379 urti urti/549 . 349
SFX 7379 urtis urtis/549 . 349

SFX 7380 Y 2
SFX 7380 urti urti/550 . 349
SFX 7380 urtis urtis/550 . 349

SFX 7381 Y 2
SFX 7381 urti urti/551 . 349
SFX 7381 urtis urtis/551 . 349

SFX 7382 Y 2
SFX 7382 urti urti/552 . 349
SFX 7382 urtis urtis/552 . 349

SFX 7383 Y 2
SFX 7383 urti urti/553 . 349
SFX 7383 urtis urtis/553 . 349

SFX 7394 Y 2
SFX 7394 urti ūra/554 . 350
SFX 7394 urtis ūrasi/554 . 350

SFX 7395 Y 2
SFX 7395 urti ūra/555 . 350
SFX 7395 urtis ūrasi/555 . 350

SFX 7396 Y 2
SFX 7396 urti ūra/556 . 350
SFX 7396 urtis ūrasi/556 . 350

SFX 7397 Y 2
SFX 7397 urti ūra/557 . 350
SFX 7397 urtis ūrasi/557 . 350

SFX 7398 Y 2
SFX 7398 urti ūra/558 . 350
SFX 7398 urtis ūrasi/558 . 350

SFX 7399 Y 2
SFX 7399 urti ūra/559 . 350
SFX 7399 urtis ūrasi/559 . 350

SFX 7400 Y 2
SFX 7400 urti ūra/560 . 350
SFX 7400 urtis ūrasi/560 . 350

SFX 7401 Y 2
SFX 7401 urti ūra/561 . 350
SFX 7401 urtis ūrasi/561 . 350

SFX 7402 Y 2
SFX 7402 urti ūra/562 . 350
SFX 7402 urtis ūrasi/562 . 350

SFX 7412 Y 1
SFX 7412 urti ūrie/563 . 350

SFX 7413 Y 1
SFX 7413 urtis ūrie/564 . 350

SFX 7414 Y 2
SFX 7414 urti uro/565 . 351
SFX 7414 urtis urosi/565 . 351

SFX 7415 Y 2
SFX 7415 urti uro/566 . 351
SFX 7415 urtis urosi/566 . 351

SFX 7416 Y 2
SFX 7416 urti uro/567 . 351
SFX 7416 urtis urosi/567 . 351

SFX 7420 Y 2
SFX 7420 sti sti/544 . 349
SFX 7420 stis stis/544 . 349

SFX 7421 Y 2
SFX 7421 sti sti/545 . 349
SFX 7421 stis stis/545 . 349

SFX 7422 Y 2
SFX 7422 sti sti/546 . 349
SFX 7422 stis stis/546 . 349

SFX 7423 Y 2
SFX 7423 sti sti/547 . 349
SFX 7423 stis stis/547 . 349

SFX 7424 Y 2
SFX 7424 sti sti/548 . 349
SFX 7424 stis stis/548 . 349

SFX 7425 Y 2
SFX 7425 sti sti/549 . 349
SFX 7425 stis stis/549 . 349

SFX 7426 Y 2
SFX 7426 sti sti/550 . 349
SFX 7426 stis stis/550 . 349

SFX 7427 Y 2
SFX 7427 sti sti/551 . 349
SFX 7427 stis stis/551 . 349

SFX 7428 Y 2
SFX 7428 sti sti/552 . 349
SFX 7428 stis stis/552 . 349

SFX 7429 Y 2
SFX 7429 sti sti/553 . 349
SFX 7429 stis stis/553 . 349

SFX 7440 Y 2
SFX 7440 sti da/554 . 350
SFX 7440 stis dasi/554 . 350

SFX 7441 Y 2
SFX 7441 sti da/555 . 350
SFX 7441 stis dasi/555 . 350

SFX 7442 Y 2
SFX 7442 sti da/556 . 350
SFX 7442 stis dasi/556 . 350

SFX 7443 Y 2
SFX 7443 sti da/557 . 350
SFX 7443 stis dasi/557 . 350

SFX 7444 Y 2
SFX 7444 sti da/558 . 350
SFX 7444 stis dasi/558 . 350

SFX 7445 Y 2
SFX 7445 sti da/559 . 350
SFX 7445 stis dasi/559 . 350

SFX 7446 Y 2
SFX 7446 sti da/560 . 350
SFX 7446 stis dasi/560 . 350

SFX 7447 Y 2
SFX 7447 sti da/561 . 350
SFX 7447 stis dasi/561 . 350

SFX 7448 Y 2
SFX 7448 sti da/562 . 350
SFX 7448 stis dasi/562 . 350

SFX 7458 Y 1
SFX 7458 sti die/563 . 350

SFX 7459 Y 1
SFX 7459 stis die/564 . 350

SFX 7460 Y 2
SFX 7460 sti dė/565 . 351
SFX 7460 stis dėsi/565 . 351

SFX 7461 Y 2
SFX 7461 sti dė/566 . 351
SFX 7461 stis dėsi/566 . 351

SFX 7462 Y 2
SFX 7462 sti dė/567 . 351
SFX 7462 stis dėsi/567 . 351

SFX 7466 Y 2
SFX 7466 umti umti/544 . 349
SFX 7466 umtis umtis/544 . 349

SFX 7467 Y 2
SFX 7467 umti umti/545 . 349
SFX 7467 umtis umtis/545 . 349

SFX 7468 Y 2
SFX 7468 umti umti/546 . 349
SFX 7468 umtis umtis/546 . 349

SFX 7469 Y 2
SFX 7469 umti umti/547 . 349
SFX 7469 umtis umtis/547 . 349

SFX 7470 Y 2
SFX 7470 umti umti/548 . 349
SFX 7470 umtis umtis/548 . 349

SFX 7471 Y 2
SFX 7471 umti umti/549 . 349
SFX 7471 umtis umtis/549 . 349

SFX 7472 Y 2
SFX 7472 umti umti/550 . 349
SFX 7472 umtis umtis/550 . 349

SFX 7473 Y 2
SFX 7473 umti umti/551 . 349
SFX 7473 umtis umtis/551 . 349

SFX 7474 Y 2
SFX 7474 umti umti/552 . 349
SFX 7474 umtis umtis/552 . 349

SFX 7475 Y 2
SFX 7475 umti umti/553 . 349
SFX 7475 umtis umtis/553 . 349

SFX 7486 Y 2
SFX 7486 umti umia/554 . 350
SFX 7486 umtis umiasi/554 . 350

SFX 7487 Y 2
SFX 7487 umti umia/555 . 350
SFX 7487 umtis umiasi/555 . 350

SFX 7488 Y 2
SFX 7488 umti umia/556 . 350
SFX 7488 umtis umiasi/556 . 350

SFX 7489 Y 2
SFX 7489 umti umia/557 . 350
SFX 7489 umtis umiasi/557 . 350

SFX 7490 Y 2
SFX 7490 umti umia/558 . 350
SFX 7490 umtis umiasi/558 . 350

SFX 7491 Y 2
SFX 7491 umti umia/559 . 350
SFX 7491 umtis umiasi/559 . 350

SFX 7492 Y 2
SFX 7492 umti umia/560 . 350
SFX 7492 umtis umiasi/560 . 350

SFX 7493 Y 2
SFX 7493 umti umia/561 . 350
SFX 7493 umtis umiasi/561 . 350

SFX 7494 Y 2
SFX 7494 umti umia/562 . 350
SFX 7494 umtis umiasi/562 . 350

SFX 7504 Y 1
SFX 7504 umti umie/563 . 350

SFX 7505 Y 1
SFX 7505 umtis umie/564 . 350

SFX 7506 Y 2
SFX 7506 umti ūmė/565 . 351
SFX 7506 umtis ūmėsi/565 . 351

SFX 7507 Y 2
SFX 7507 umti ūmė/566 . 351
SFX 7507 umtis ūmėsi/566 . 351

SFX 7508 Y 2
SFX 7508 umti ūmė/567 . 351
SFX 7508 umtis ūmėsi/567 . 351

SFX 7512 Y 2
SFX 7512 gzti gzti/544 . 349
SFX 7512 gztis gztis/544 . 349

SFX 7513 Y 2
SFX 7513 gzti gzti/545 . 349
SFX 7513 gztis gztis/545 . 349

SFX 7514 Y 2
SFX 7514 gzti gzti/546 . 349
SFX 7514 gztis gztis/546 . 349

SFX 7515 Y 2
SFX 7515 gzti gzti/547 . 349
SFX 7515 gztis gztis/547 . 349

SFX 7516 Y 2
SFX 7516 gzti gzti/548 . 349
SFX 7516 gztis gztis/548 . 349

SFX 7517 Y 2
SFX 7517 gzti gzti/549 . 349
SFX 7517 gztis gztis/549 . 349

SFX 7518 Y 2
SFX 7518 gzti gzti/550 . 349
SFX 7518 gztis gztis/550 . 349

SFX 7519 Y 2
SFX 7519 gzti gzti/551 . 349
SFX 7519 gztis gztis/551 . 349

SFX 7520 Y 2
SFX 7520 gzti gzti/552 . 349
SFX 7520 gztis gztis/552 . 349

SFX 7521 Y 2
SFX 7521 gzti gzti/553 . 349
SFX 7521 gztis gztis/553 . 349

SFX 7532 Y 2
SFX 7532 gzti zgia/554 . 350
SFX 7532 gztis zgiasi/554 . 350

SFX 7533 Y 2
SFX 7533 gzti zgia/555 . 350
SFX 7533 gztis zgiasi/555 . 350

SFX 7534 Y 2
SFX 7534 gzti zgia/556 . 350
SFX 7534 gztis zgiasi/556 . 350

SFX 7535 Y 2
SFX 7535 gzti zgia/557 . 350
SFX 7535 gztis zgiasi/557 . 350

SFX 7536 Y 2
SFX 7536 gzti zgia/558 . 350
SFX 7536 gztis zgiasi/558 . 350

SFX 7537 Y 2
SFX 7537 gzti zgia/559 . 350
SFX 7537 gztis zgiasi/559 . 350

SFX 7538 Y 2
SFX 7538 gzti zgia/560 . 350
SFX 7538 gztis zgiasi/560 . 350

SFX 7539 Y 2
SFX 7539 gzti zgia/561 . 350
SFX 7539 gztis zgiasi/561 . 350

SFX 7540 Y 2
SFX 7540 gzti zgia/562 . 350
SFX 7540 gztis zgiasi/562 . 350

SFX 7550 Y 1
SFX 7550 gzti zgie/563 . 350

SFX 7551 Y 1
SFX 7551 gztis zgie/564 . 350

SFX 7552 Y 2
SFX 7552 gzti zgė/565 . 351
SFX 7552 gztis zgėsi/565 . 351

SFX 7553 Y 2
SFX 7553 gzti zgė/566 . 351
SFX 7553 gztis zgėsi/566 . 351

SFX 7554 Y 2
SFX 7554 gzti zgė/567 . 351
SFX 7554 gztis zgėsi/567 . 351

SFX 7558 Y 2
SFX 7558 urti urti/544 . 349
SFX 7558 urtis urtis/544 . 349

SFX 7559 Y 2
SFX 7559 urti urti/545 . 349
SFX 7559 urtis urtis/545 . 349

SFX 7560 Y 2
SFX 7560 urti urti/546 . 349
SFX 7560 urtis urtis/546 . 349

SFX 7561 Y 2
SFX 7561 urti urti/547 . 349
SFX 7561 urtis urtis/547 . 349

SFX 7562 Y 2
SFX 7562 urti urti/548 . 349
SFX 7562 urtis urtis/548 . 349

SFX 7563 Y 2
SFX 7563 urti urti/549 . 349
SFX 7563 urtis urtis/549 . 349

SFX 7564 Y 2
SFX 7564 urti urti/550 . 349
SFX 7564 urtis urtis/550 . 349

SFX 7565 Y 2
SFX 7565 urti urti/551 . 349
SFX 7565 urtis urtis/551 . 349

SFX 7566 Y 2
SFX 7566 urti urti/552 . 349
SFX 7566 urtis urtis/552 . 349

SFX 7567 Y 2
SFX 7567 urti urti/553 . 349
SFX 7567 urtis urtis/553 . 349

SFX 7578 Y 2
SFX 7578 urti uria/554 . 350
SFX 7578 urtis uriasi/554 . 350

SFX 7579 Y 2
SFX 7579 urti uria/555 . 350
SFX 7579 urtis uriasi/555 . 350

SFX 7580 Y 2
SFX 7580 urti uria/556 . 350
SFX 7580 urtis uriasi/556 . 350

SFX 7581 Y 2
SFX 7581 urti uria/557 . 350
SFX 7581 urtis uriasi/557 . 350

SFX 7582 Y 2
SFX 7582 urti uria/558 . 350
SFX 7582 urtis uriasi/558 . 350

SFX 7583 Y 2
SFX 7583 urti uria/559 . 350
SFX 7583 urtis uriasi/559 . 350

SFX 7584 Y 2
SFX 7584 urti uria/560 . 350
SFX 7584 urtis uriasi/560 . 350

SFX 7585 Y 2
SFX 7585 urti uria/561 . 350
SFX 7585 urtis uriasi/561 . 350

AF 7466,7467,7486,7506,65521 # 136
AF 7420,7421,7440,7460,65521 # 197
AF 7374,7375,7394,7414,65521 # 207
AF 7512,7513,7532,7552,65521 # 228
AF 7558,7559,7578,7598,65521 # 238
AF 7420,7421,7429,7440,7448,7460,7462,65521 # 472
