lt_LT.dic
apskurti/207	12
apspurti/207	12
atidumti/136	12
atsivesti/197	14
atstumti/136	12
bepridurti/238	12
besti/197	12
birgzti/228	12
burgzti/228	12
burtis/238	14
dumti/136	12
dūgzti/228	12
gurti/207	12
išdumti/136	12
išdurti/238	12
išstumti/136	12
išvesti/197	12
kurtis/238	14
neapskurti/207	34
neapstumti/136	34
neapvesti/197	34
neatstumti/136	34
neatvesti/197	34
nebeatkurti/238	34
nebedūgzti/228	34
nebeišstumti/136	34
nebekurti/238	34
nebenusivesti/197	35
nebepastumti/136	34
nebepavesti/197	34
nebesiburti/238	35
nebesigrumti/136	35
nebesti/197	34
nebesukurti/238	34
nebeurgzti/228	34
nebeužkurti/238	34
nebeužsivesti/197	35
nebeėsti/197	34
neburgzti/228	34
neburti/238	34
nedumti/136	34
nedūgzti/228	34
neišsidurti/238	35
neišsistumti/136	35
neniurgzti/228	34
nenusistumti/136	35
nenusivesti/197	35
nenuskurti/207	34
nepadurti/238	34
nepardumti/136	34
neparvesti/197	34
neperdurti/238	34
nepersivesti/197	35
neprakiurti/207	34
neprasidurti/238	35
neprasistumti/136	35
nepraėsti/197	34
neprisikurti/238	35
nesigrumti/136	35
nesivesti/197	35
nespurti/207	34
nesuburgzti/228	34
nesuburti/238	34
nesusidurti/238	35
nesusistumti/136	35
nesusiėsti/197	35
nesuurgzti/228	34
nesužiurti/207	34
neurgzti/228	34
neužsikurti/238	35
neužvesti/197	34
neįsibesti/197	35
neįsikurti/238	35
neėsti/197	34
niurgzti/228	12
nuburgzti/228	12
nudumti/136	12
nuskurti/207	12
paburgzti/228	12
padurti/238	12
papurti/207	12
parsivesti/197	14
parstumti/136	12
paurgzti/228	12
pavesti/472	12
paėsti/197	12
persistumti/136	14
pervesti/197	12
praburgzti/228	12
pradurti/238	12
prakiurti/207	12
prisikurti/238	14
prisistumti/136	14
purti/207	12
spurti/207	12
suburgzti/228	12
sudūgzti/228	12
sugurti/207	12
sukiurti/207	12
suniurgzti/228	12
susigrumti/136	14
susivesti/197	14
suurgzti/228	12
sužiurti/207	12
tebeburgzti/228	12
tebedūgzti/228	12
tebekurti/238	12
tebestumti/136	12
tebeurgzti/228	12
tebeėsti/197	12
tedūgzti/228	12
testumti/136	12
tesudurti/238	12
urgzti/228	12
užburgzti/228	12
užsikurti/238	14
užvesti/197	12
įstumti/136	12
įvesti/197	12
